Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Merger

§ 17-19-1101.
Approval of plan of merger.

Subject to the limitations set forth in W.S.

17-19-1102

, one (1) or more nonprofit corporations may merge into a business or nonprofit corporation, if the plan of merger is approved as provided in W.S.

17-19-1103

.

The plan of merger shall set forth:

The name of each corporation planning to merge and the name of the surviving corporation into which each plans to merge;

The terms and conditions of the planned merger;

The manner and basis, if any, of converting the memberships of each public benefit or religious corporation into memberships of the surviving corporation; and

If the merger involves a mutual benefit corporation, the manner and basis, if any, of converting memberships of each merging corporation into memberships, obligations or securities of the surviving or any other corporation or into cash or other property in whole or part.

The plan of merger may set forth:

Any amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the surviving corporation to be effected by the planned merger; and

Other provisions relating to the planned merger.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1102.
Limitations on mergers by public benefit or religious corporations.

Without the prior approval of a district court in a proceeding which the secretary of state has been given written notice, a public benefit or religious corporation may merge only with:

A public benefit or religious corporation;

A foreign corporation that would qualify under this act as a public benefit or religious corporation;

A wholly-owned foreign or domestic business or mutual benefit corporation, provided the public benefit or religious corporation is the surviving corporation and continues to be a public benefit or religious corporation after the merger;

A governmental subdivision; or

A business or mutual benefit corporation, provided that:

On or prior to the effective date of the merger, assets with a value equal to the greater of the fair market value of the net tangible and intangible assets, including goodwill, of the public benefit corporation or the fair market value of the public benefit corporation if it were to be operated as a business concern are transferred or conveyed to one (1) or more persons who would have received its assets under W.S. 17-19-1406(a)(v) and (vi) had it dissolved;

It shall return, transfer or convey any assets held by it upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the merger, in accordance with the condition; and

The merger is approved by a majority of directors of the public benefit or religious corporation who are not and will not become members or shareholders in or officers, employees, agents or consultants of the surviving corporation.

At least twenty (20) days before consummation of any merger of a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation pursuant to paragraph (a)(v) of this section, notice including a copy of the proposed plan of merger, shall be delivered to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall notify the attorney general of the proposed plan.

Without the prior written consent of the attorney general or of the district court in a proceeding in which the attorney general has been given notice, no member of a public benefit or religious corporation may receive or keep anything as a result of a merger other than a membership or membership in the surviving public benefit or religious corporation. The court shall approve the transaction if it is in the public interest.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(ii), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1103.
Action on plan by board, members and third persons.

Unless this act, the articles, bylaws or the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, require a greater vote or voting by class, a plan of merger to be adopted shall be approved:

By the board;

By the members, if any, by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles authorized by W.S.

17-19-1030

for an amendment to the articles or bylaws.

If the corporation does not have members, the merger shall be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the merger is approved. In addition the corporation shall provide notice of any directors’ meeting at which such approval is to be obtained in accordance with W.S. 17-19-822(c). The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed merger.

The board may condition its submission of the proposed merger, and the members may condition their approval of the merger, on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the board seeks to have the plan approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice to its members of the proposed membership meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-19-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the surviving corporation shall include any provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle members to vote on the provision. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the disappearing corporation shall include a copy or summary of the articles and bylaws that will be in effect immediately after the merger takes effect.

If the board seeks to have the plan approved by the members by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the surviving corporation shall include any provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle members to vote on the provision. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the disappearing corporation shall include a copy or summary of the articles and bylaws that will be in effect immediately after the merger takes effect.

Voting by a class of members is required on a plan of merger if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle the class of members to vote as a class on the proposed amendment under W.S.

17-19-1004

or

17-19-1022

. The plan is approved by a class of members by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the voting power of the class, whichever is less.

After a merger is adopted, and at any time before articles of merger are filed, the planned merger may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further action by members or other persons who approved the plan in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1104.
Articles of merger.

After a plan of merger is approved by the board of directors, and if required by W.S.

17-19-1103

, by the members and any other persons, the surviving or acquiring corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state articles of merger setting forth:

The plan of merger;

If approval of members was not required, a statement to that effect and a statement that the plan was approved by a sufficient vote of the board of directors;

If approval by members was required:

The designation, number of memberships outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote separately on the plan, and number of votes of each class indisputably voting on the plan; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each class entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan by each class and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each class was sufficient for approval by that class.

If approval of the plan by some person or persons other than the members or the board is required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1103

(a)(iii), a statement that the approval was obtained.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1105.
Effect of merger.

When a merger takes effect:

Every other corporation party to the merger merges into the surviving corporation and the separate existence of every corporation except the surviving corporation ceases;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by each corporation party to the merger is vested in the surviving corporation without reversion or impairment subject to any and all conditions to which the property was subject prior to the merger;

The surviving corporation has all liabilities and obligations of each corporation party to the merger;

A proceeding pending against any corporation party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the surviving corporation may be substituted in the proceeding for the corporation whose existence ceased; and

The articles of incorporation and bylaws of the surviving corporation are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1106.
Merger with foreign corporation.

Except as provided in W.S.

17-19-1102

, one (1) or more foreign business or nonprofit corporations may merge with one (1) or more domestic nonprofit corporations if:

The merger is permitted by the law of the state or country under whose law each foreign corporation is incorporated and each foreign corporation complies with that law in effecting the merger;

The foreign corporation complies with W.S.

17-19-1104

if it is the surviving corporation of the merger; and

Each domestic nonprofit corporation complies with the applicable provisions of W.S.

17-19-1101

through

17-19-1103

and, if it is the surviving corporation of the merger, with W.S.

17-19-1104

.

Upon the merger taking effect, the surviving foreign business or nonprofit corporation is deemed to have irrevocably appointed the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any proceeding brought against it.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1107.
Bequests, devises and gifts.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription or conveyance, that is made to a constituent corporation and that takes effect or remains payable after the merger, inures to the surviving corporation unless the will or other instrument otherwise specifically provides.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1108.
Merger with a governmental subdivision.

Except for W.S.

17-19-1102

, this article does not apply if a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation merges with a governmental subdivision. The corporation shall file with the secretary of state notice of the consummated merger.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.